Washington statutes.
RCW 19.16.210

Accounting and payments by licensee to customer.

A licensee shall within thirty days after the close of each calendar month account in writing to his, her, or its customers for all collections made during that calendar month and pay to his, her, or its customers the net proceeds due and payable of all collections made during that calendar month except that a licensee need not account to the customer for:

(1) Court costs recovered which were previously advanced by licensee or his, her, or its attorney.

(2) Attorneys' fees and interest or other charges incidental to the principal amount of the obligation legally and properly belonging to the licensee, if such charges are retained by the licensee after the principal amount of the obligation has been accounted for and remitted to the customer. When the net proceeds are less than ten dollars at the end of any calendar month, payments may be deferred for a period not to exceed three months.

[ 2011 c 336 s 516; 1971 ex.s. c 253 s 12.]